Wisconsin, session 2025, SB390.
do enact as follows:SB390,14Section 1. 341.135 (2m) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, 5is amended to read:SB390,2,51341.135 (2m) Fees. Beginning with registration plates issued on October 1, 22026 2025, the department shall assess a fee of $6 per plate for the issuance of new 3registration plates that are not replacement plates for which a fee is collected under 4s. 341.16. The fee under this subsection is an addition to any other fee required for 5the registration of a vehicle.SB390,26Section 2. 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, section 9444 (1) is amended to read:SB390,2,87[2025 Wisconsin Act 15] Section 9444 (1) Heavy vehicle registration fees. 8The treatment of s. 341.25 (2) (c) to (q) (2m) takes effect on October 1, 2025.SB390,39Section 3. Fiscal changes.SB390,2,1310(1) Protective services hearing protection. In the schedule under s. 1120.005 (3) for the appropriation to the Joint Committee on Finance under s. 20.865 12(4) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $2,600,000 for the 13purpose of the public protective services hearing protection program under s. 85.65.SB390,2,1414